Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6245.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, there is appropriated for the public schools of this state and certain other state purposes relating to education the sum of $18,179,025,300.00 $18,179,075,300.00 from the state school aid fund, the sum of $73,151,100.00 from the general fund, an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 from the school consolidation and infrastructure fund created under section 11x, an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 from the school transportation fund created under section 22k, an amount not to exceed $71,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund created under section 29, an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00 from the great start readiness program reserve fund created under section 32e, an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship public provider fund created under section 27d, an amount not to exceed $97,037,400.00 from the state school aid pupil support reserve fund created under section 22r, and an amount not to exceed $600,000.00 from the general pupil support reserve fund created under section 22s. For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2027, there is appropriated for the public schools of this state and certain other state purposes relating to education the sum of $18,856,252,300.00 from the state school aid fund, the sum of $57,984,900.00 from the general fund, an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 from the school transportation fund created under section 22k, an amount not to exceed $130,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund created under section 29, an amount not to exceed $26,300,000.00 from the great start readiness program reserve fund created under section 32e, an amount not to exceed $80,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship public provider fund created under section 27d, an amount not to exceed $7,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship private provider fund created under section 27e, an amount not to exceed $107,037,400.00 from the state school aid pupil support reserve fund created under section 22r, and an amount not to exceed $600,000.00 from the general pupil support reserve fund created under section 22s. In addition, all available federal funds are appropriated as allocated in this article for the fiscal years ending September 30, 2026 and September 30, 2027. (2) The appropriations under this section are allocated as provided in this article. Money appropriated under this section from the general fund must be expended to fund the purposes of this article before the expenditure of money appropriated under this section from the state school aid fund. (3) Any general fund allocations under this article that are not expended by the end of the fiscal year are transferred to the school aid stabilization fund created under section 11a. Sec. 72. From the state school aid fund money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to exceed $50,000.00 to the learner-first district board created under section 565 of the revised school code, MCL 380.565, for the operation of the learner-first district as described in sections 562 to 569 of the revised school code, MCL 380.562 to 380.569. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5919 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.